Utah statutes.
52-4-208.   Chance or social meetings.

(1)  This chapter does not apply to any chance meeting or a social meeting.

(2)  A chance meeting or social meeting may not be used to circumvent the provisions of this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 14, 2006 General Session

